New Jersey, session 222, S4055.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, "inflammatory breast cancer" means a type of invasive breast cancer that blocks lymph vessels in the skin. b.    The curriculum in each educational program of professional nursing in this State shall include education on inflammatory breast cancer, which shall be developed in consultation with experts on the study, diagnosis, and treatment of inflammatory breast cancer. 2.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the 12th month next following enactment, except that the commissioner and the Board of Nursing may take any anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as may be necessary for the implementation of this act.